Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.080

Board of directors—Meetings—Terms—Compensation.

The board shall initially convene at the call of the representative of the correctional industries division of the state department of corrections, together with the jail administrator selected from a city or a county with an established jail industries program, no later than six months after July 25, 1993. Subsequent meetings of the board shall be at the call of the board chairperson. The board shall meet at least twice a year.

The board shall elect a chairperson and other such officers as it deems appropriate. However, the chairperson may not be the representative of the correctional industries division of the state department of corrections nor any representative from a state executive branch agency.

Members of the board shall serve terms of three years each on a staggered schedule to be established by the first board. For purposes of initiating a staggered schedule of terms, some members of the first board may initially serve two years and some members may initially serve four years.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses from funds acquired under this chapter.

[ 1993 c 285 s 8.]